Utah statutes.
61-2g-404.   Registration, licensure, or certification prerequisite to suit for compensation.

A person engaged in the business of real estate appraising in this state or acting in the capacity of a real estate appraiser in this state may not bring or maintain an action as a plaintiff in a court of this state to collect compensation for the performance of real estate appraisal services for which registration, licensure, or certification is required by this chapter without alleging and proving that the person was the holder of a valid registration, license, or certification in this state at all times during the performance of the real estate appraisal services.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 289, 2011 General Session

